New York, session 2025-2026, A2087.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "veterans' memorials preservation act". 3 § 2. Definitions. For the purposes of this act: 4 (a) a "memorial" is any park, monument, field, open land, grove of 5 trees, building, structure, artwork, tablet, plaque, wall, or any other 6 structure that has been donated to, or constructed by, a public entity 7 as a memorial to veterans of any war, conflict, or police action engaged 8 in by the armed forces of the United States, or any state of the United 9 States, or the New York national guard. 10 (b) a "public entity" is any governmental body of any kind, including, 11 but not limited to, the state, a city, town, village, borough, school 12 district or public authority. 13 § 3. Memorials shall be preserved and be open to the public. (a) Any 14 public entity that has created or received a gift of a memorial shall 15 not alter, destroy, reconfigure, adjust, change, modify or move such 16 memorial, or cause or permit any person to commit such acts; provided, 17 however, that such acts are permitted when reasonably necessary. 18 (b) Any public entity that has created a memorial or accepted a gift 19 of a memorial shall maintain the memorial in a reasonable manner. 20 (c) A public entity shall not restrict access to a memorial except as 21 reasonably necessary. 22 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00571-01-5